Tennessee statutes. Title 27 Appeal And Review
Chapter 7

Writ of Error Coram Nobis

27-7-101. Right to relief.

Any person aggrieved by the judgment of any court in a civil case which is not governed by the Tennessee Rules of Civil Procedure by reason of a material error in fact may reverse the judgment upon writ of error coram nobis as provided in this chapter.

Code 1858, § 3110; Shan., § 4838; Code 1932, § 8971; Acts 1972, ch. 565, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-701.

Compiler's Notes. Tenn. R. Civ. P. 60.02 was intended to supersede this chapter. See the Committee Comment to that rule.

Cross-References. Clerk's fees, §8-21-401.

Writ in criminal cases, §40-26-105.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 659.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 265; 16 Tenn. Juris., Judgments and Decrees, §§ 52, 54.

Law Reviews.

Appellate and Post Conviction Relief in Tennessee (Ronald W. Eades), 5 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 1.

Divorce and Separation — Vacation of Decree — Writ of Error Coram Nobis Is a Proper Action to Vacate Divorce Decree (Nina Loree Booth), 1 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 225.

Guilty Pleas — Seeking Relief When Statute Held Unconstitutional Retroactively, 43 Tenn. L. Rev. 464.

Procedure and Evidence — 1960 Tennessee Survey (Edmund M. Morgan), 13 Vand. L. Rev. 1197.

Procedure and Evidence — 1961 Tennessee Survey (II) (Edmund M. Morgan, Joel F. Handler), 15 Vand. L. Rev. 921.

Procedure — Writ of Error Coram Nobis in Divorce Cases, 36 Tenn. L. Rev. 411.

Tennessee Criminal Law: An Overview of the Courts and a Compendium of Tennessee Criminal Procedure (Michael R. Tilley), 5 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 90.

27-7-102. Errors reached by writ.

The relief embraced in this chapter is confined to errors of fact occurring in proceedings of which the person seeking relief has had no notice, or which such person was prevented by disability from showing or correcting, or where a defense was prevented by surprise, accident, mistake, or fraud, without fault on such person's part. Thus, infancy at the rendition of the judgment, not appearing on the record sought to be corrected, or a real defense to an action by motion, of which the party aggrieved had no notice, and so of like cases, are good grounds for relief under this writ.

Code 1858, §§ 3116, 3117; Shan., §§ 4844, 4845; Code 1932, §§ 8977, 8978; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-702.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Judgments and Decrees, § 54.

Law Reviews.

Appellate and Post Conviction Relief in Tennessee (Ronald W. Eades), 5 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 1.

Divorce and Separation — Vacation of Decree — Writ of Error Coram Nobis Is a Proper Action to Vacate Divorce Decree (Nina Loree Booth), 1 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 225.

Guilty Pleas — Seeking Relief When Statute Held Unconstitutional Retroactively, 43 Tenn. L. Rev. 464.

Procedure — Writ of Error Coram Nobis in Divorce Cases, 36 Tenn. L. Rev. 411.

Recent Developments in Tennessee and Federal Procedure (Donald F. Paine), 36 Tenn. L. Rev. 276.

27-7-103. Petition — Supersedeas.

The writ of error coram nobis may be had within one (1) year after the judgment becomes final by petition presented to the judge at chambers or in open court, who may order it to operate as a supersedeas or not.

Code 1858, § 3111; Shan., § 4839; Code 1932, § 8972; Acts 1967, ch. 386, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-703.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by Tenn. R. Civ. P. 60.02, as to relief from mistakes, inadvertence, excusable neglect and fraud.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 33.74.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 9 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error § 9; 11 Tenn. Juris., Evidence, § 13; 16 Tenn. Juris., Judgments and Decrees, § 56.

Law Reviews.

Appellate and Post Conviction Relief in Tennessee (Ronald W. Eades), 5 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 1.

Guilty Pleas — Seeking Relief When Statute Held Unconstitutional Retroactively, 43 Tenn. L. Rev. 464.

Tennessee Criminal Law: An Overview of the Courts and a Compendium of Tennessee Criminal Procedure (Michael R. Tilley), 5 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 90.

27-7-104. Bond for supersedeas.

Before such order shall operate as a supersedeas, the party applying shall give bond, with good security, in double the amount of the judgment, conditioned to abide by and perform the judgment or decree of the court.

Code 1858, § 3112; Shan., § 4840; Code 1932, § 8973; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-704.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Judgments and Decrees, § 56.

27-7-105. Notice to opposite party.

Notice of the suing out of the writ shall be served on the opposite party, or that party's attorney, at least ten (10) days prior to the term of the court to which the writ is returnable, or the cause shall be continued to the next succeeding term, unless the party entitled to notice consents to a trial at the first term.

Code 1858, § 3113; Shan., § 4841; Code 1932, § 8974; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-705.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Judgments and Decrees, § 56.

27-7-106. Failure to try at first term.

If the matter is not tried at the first term after the writ is sued out, the court may discharge the supersedeas, upon the motion of the adverse party, and the supersedeas's denial on oath of the facts alleged in the petition, upon taking a refunding bond, with good security, to perform the judgment in case the suit should be eventually decided in favor of the party suing out the writ.

Code 1858, § 3118; Shan., § 4846; Code 1932, § 8979; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-706.

27-7-107. Rules — Orders of publication.

The court may order publication for nonresident defendants, who have no known agent or attorney in the state, and may prescribe rules for the assignment of errors, making issues thereon, and for all such other matters as are necessary to give full effect to this proceeding.

Code 1858, § 3115; Shan., § 4843; Code 1932, § 8976; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-707.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Judgments and Decrees, § 56.

27-7-108. Judgment against plaintiff in error.

In all cases of affirmance of the judgment, or dismissal of the writ for any cause, where the original judgment has been superseded, judgment shall be rendered against the plaintiff in error and any sureties for the amount of the former judgment, with interest at the rate of twelve and one-half percent (12½%) per annum from the rendition thereof, and all costs.

Code 1858, § 3114; Shan., § 4842; Code 1932, § 8975; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-708.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Judgments and Decrees, § 56.